Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Hospital and Nursing Home Licensure and Inspection.
, or issued by a duly authorized administrative agency conducting an investigation, audit, review or proceedings regarding a health care entity’s conduct.The provisions of this subsection shall apply to subpoenas for the health records of both minors and adults.Nothing in this subsection shall have any effect on the existing authority of a court or administrative agency to issue a protective order regarding health records, including, but not limited to, ordering the return of health records to a health care entity, after the period for filing a motion to quash has passed.A subpoena for substance abuse records must conform to the requirements of federal law found in 42 C.F.R. Part 2, Subpart E.

Health care entities may testify about the health records of an individual in compliance with §§

8.01-399

and

8.01-400.2

.

If an individual requests a copy of his health record from a health care entity, the health care entity may impose a reasonable cost-based fee, which shall include only the cost of supplies for and labor of copying the requested information, postage when the individual requests that such information be mailed, and preparation of an explanation or summary of such information as agreed to by the individual. For the purposes of this section, “individual” shall subsume a person with authority to act on behalf of the individual who is the subject of the health record in making decisions related to his health care.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care provider who prescribes or dispenses a controlled substance required to be reported to the Prescription Monitoring Program established pursuant to Chapter 25.2 (§ 54.1-2519 et seq.) of Title 54.1 to a patient from disclosing information obtained from the Prescription Monitoring Program and contained in a patient’s health care record to another health care provider when such disclosure is related to the care or treatment of the patient who is the subject of the record.

An authorization for the disclosure of health records executed pursuant to this section shall remain in effect until (i) the authorization is revoked in writing and delivered to the health care entity maintaining the record that is subject to the authorization by the person who executed the authorization, (ii) any expiration date set forth in the authorization, or (iii) the health care entity maintaining the record becomes aware of any expiration event described in the authorization, whichever occurs first. However, any revocation of an authorization for the disclosure of health records executed pursuant to this section shall not be effective to the extent that the health care entity maintaining the record has disclosed health records prior to delivery of such revocation in reliance upon the authorization or as otherwise provided pursuant to 45 C.F.R. § 164.508. A statement in an authorization for the disclosure of health records pursuant to this section that the information to be used or disclosed is “all health records” is a sufficient description for the disclosure of all health records of the person maintained by the health care provider to whom the authorization was granted. If a health care provider receives a written revocation of an authorization for the disclosure of health records in accordance with this subsection, a copy of such written revocation shall be included in the person’s original health record maintained by the health care provider.

An authorization for the disclosure of health records executed pursuant to this section shall, unless otherwise expressly limited in the authorization, be deemed to include authorization for the person named in the authorization to assist the person who is the subject of the health record in accessing health care services, including scheduling appointments for the person who is the subject of the health record and attending appointments together with the person who is the subject of the health record.

AUTHORIZATION TO RELEASE CONFIDENTIAL HEALTH RECORDS Individual’s Name Health Care Entity’s Name Person, Agency, or Health Care Entity to whom disclosure is to be made Information or Health Records to be disclosed Purpose of Disclosure or at the Request of the Individual As the person signing this authorization, I understand that I am giving my permission to the above-named health care entity for disclosure of confidential health records. I understand that the health care entity may not condition treatment or payment on my willingness to sign this authorization unless the specific circumstances under which such conditioning is permitted by law are applicable and are set forth in this authorization. I also understand that I have the right to revoke this authorization at any time, but that my revocation is not effective until delivered in writing to the person who is in possession of my health records and is not effective as to health records already disclosed under this authorization. A copy of this authorization and a notation concerning the persons or agencies to whom disclosure was made shall be included with my original health records. I understand that health information disclosed under this authorization might be redisclosed by a recipient and may, as a result of such disclosure, no longer be protected to the same extent as such health information was protected by law while solely in the possession of the health care entity. This authorization expires on (date) or (event) Signature of Individual or Individual’s Legal Representative if Individual is Unable to Sign Relationship or Authority of Legal Representative Date of Signature

History.

1997, c. 682; 1998, c. 470; 1999, cc. 812, 956, 1010; 2000, cc. 810, 813, 923, 927; 2001, c. 671; 2002, cc. 568, 658, 835, 860; 2003, cc. 471, 907, 983; 2004, cc. 49, 64, 65, 66, 67, 163, 773, 1014, 1021; 2005, cc. 39, 101, 642, 697; 2006, c. 433; 2007, c. 497; 2008, cc. 315, 782, 850, 870; 2009, cc. 606, 651, 813, 840; 2010, cc. 185, 340, 406, 456, 524, 778, 825; 2011, cc. 499, 668, 798, 812, 844, 871; 2012, cc. 386, 402, 479; 2016, c. 554; 2017, cc. 457, 712, 720; 2018, c. 165; 2020, c. 945; 2022, cc. 509, 534, 784.

Cross references.

As to licensed provider statement to prospective employer, §

37.2-203.1

.

As to records which are excluded from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §§

2.2-3705.4

,

2.2-3705.5

.

As to the specific documentary requirements of actions under the Virginia Birth-Related Neurological Injury Compensation Act, see §

8.01-273.1

.

As to access to Department of Corrections records in the name of a prisoner filing civil suit against the Commonwealth, see §

8.01-697

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 514 and 551, cl. 1, repealed Acts 2000, c. 813, cl. 2, which had provided: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2001, unless reenacted by the 2001 General Assembly. Any subpoena or subpoena duces tecum issued by an attorney in compliance with this act shall remain valid notwithstanding the expiration of this act.”

Acts 2006, cc. 339 and 368, cls. 1, repealed Acts 2001, c. 671, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2003, cc. 63 and 70, cls. 2, which had provided for the July 1, 2006, expiration of subdivision D 26.

Acts 2011, cc. 798 and 871, cl. 7 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, except that the provisions of the fifth enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “Chapter 10 (§

37.2-1000

et seq.) of Title 37.2” was changed to “Chapter 20 (§

64.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 64.2” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “23.1-805” was substituted for “23-9.2:10” in subdivision D 35 to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 810 added “including in the implementation of a hospital routine contact process” at the end of subdivision D 7; and inserted “or for decisions on anatomical gifts and organ, tissue or eye donation” in subdivision D 15.

The 2000 amendment by c. 813, in the first sentence of subsection H, inserted “or cause a subpoena duces tecum to be issued by an attorney”, and inserted “or a copy of the attorney-issued subpoena”, and added “or issuance of the subpoena” at the end of the sentence; in the second sentence of subsection H, inserted “or cause” following “request”, inserted “or a copy of the attorney-issued subpoena”, and added “or issuance of the attorney-issued subpoena” at the end of the sentence; in the first sentence of the paragraph titled “NOTICE TO PATIENT”, substituted “document” for “Request for Subpoena”, inserted “or causing issuance of the”, inserted “either” preceding “asked”, and inserted “or a subpoena has been issued by the other party’s attorney”; inserted “or causing such a subpoena to be issued” in the first sentence of subdivision H 2; inserted “or in which the action is pending as shown on the subpoena” in the first sentence of the paragraph titled, “NOTICE TO PROVIDERS”; inserted “or in whose court the action is pending” in the second sentence of subdivision H 3; inserted “or the attorney issuing the subpoena duces tecum” in the first sentence of subdivision H 4; and inserted “and any attorney-issued subpoena” in the second sentence of subdivision H 4.
See Editor’s note.

The 2000 amendment by c. 923 inserted the second sentence in subsection E.

The 2000 amendment by c. 927 added subdivision D 25 and made related changes.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 671, in subsection D, added subdivision 26 and made related changes. For expiration of this amendment, see the Editor’s note.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 568 and 658 are identical, and added subdivision D 27 and made related changes.

The 2002 amendment by c. 835 inserted “and the federal Department of Health and Human Services regulations ... Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.)” in the second sentence of the third paragraph in subsection A; substituted “law relating to public health activities, health oversight activities, serious threats to health or safety, or abuse, neglect or domestic violence, relating to” for “any other provision law including” in subdivision D 6; and added the language following “benefits already provided” at the end of subdivision D 17.

The 2002 amendment by c. 860 substituted “63.1-248.3” (now §

63.2-1519

) for “63.1-248.11” at the end of subdivision D 6.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 471 inserted “order” at the end of subdivision D 10; rewrote subdivision D 27, which formerly read: “To law-enforcement officials by each licensed emergency medical services agency, when the patient is the victim of a crime and the records consist of the prehospital patient care report required by §

32.1-116.1

if a determination has been made that such disclosure is not in violation of the federal Department of Health and Human Services regulations relating to the electronic transmission of data and patient privacy promulgated as required by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.)”; substituted “15” for “fifteen” in subsection E; inserted “Pursuant to this subsection” in subsection H; and in subdivision H 4 as it read prior to subsequent amendments, substituted “10” for “ten,” and “20” for “twenty.”

The 2003 amendment by c. 907, effective March 22, 2003, inserted the definition of “Certification” in subsection B; inserted “54.1-2506” in subdivision D 6; substituted “15” for “fifteen” in subsection E; rewrote subsection H; and inserted the subsection I designation.

The 2003 amendment by c. 983 deleted “or” at the end of subdivision C 1; added “or” at the end of subdivision C 2; added subdivision C 3; substituted “15” for “fifteen” in subsection E; and in subdivision H 4 as it read prior to subsequent amendments, substituted “10” for “ten,” and “20” for “twenty.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 49 inserted “or who hold a multistate licensure privilege issued” in the last sentence of the definition of “Health care provider” in subsection B; and substituted “five” for “5” in the last sentence of subdivision H 5.

The 2004 amendment by c. 64 deleted “54.1-2906, 54.1-2907” following “54.1-2506” in subdivision D 6.

The 2004 amendment by c. 65 rewrote the section.

The 2004 amendment by c. 66 rewrote the section.

The 2004 amendment by c. 67 rewrote the section.

The 2004 amendment by c. 163 substituted “subsection C of §

8.01-413

” for “§

8.01-413

C” in the second paragraph of subsection A; substituted “subsection B of § 54.1-2400.1” for “§ 54.1-2400.1 B” in subdivision D 19; substituted “this title” for “Title 32.1” in subdivision D 26; added subdivision D 28 [29]; substituted “five” for “5” in the last sentence of subdivision H 5; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendment by c. 773, effective April 12, 2004, substituted “this title” for “Title 32.1” in subdivision D 27; added subdivision D 28; and substituted “five” for “5” in the last sentence of subdivision H 5.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1014 rewrote the section.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1021, effective April 21, 2004, substituted “subsection B of § 54.1-2400.1” for “§ 54.1-2400.1 B” in subdivision D 19; added subdivision D 28; and substituted “5” for “five” in the last sentence of subdivision H 5.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 39 and 101 are identical, and divided former subsection A into the present introductory paragraph and subdivisions 2 and 3; in subsection A, in the introductory paragraph, inserted “or required,” substituted “other provisions” for “another provision” and deleted “or federal” preceding “law,” and inserted the present second paragraph and subdivision 1; added the paragraph defining “Psychotherapy notes” at the end of subsection B; in subdivision D 1, inserted the clause (i), (ii), and (a) designators, deleted “also” following “§ 54.1-2969” at the end of clause (a) and added clause (b); deleted “including in the implementation of a health care provider’s routine contact process pursuant to subdivision B 4 of §

32.1-127

” at the end of subdivision D 7; rewrote subdivision D 20; added the concluding paragraph of subsection D; substituted “state law” for “this Code, federal law or state or federal regulation” at the end of subsection F; added the concluding paragraph of subsection F; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 642 and 697 are identical, and added subsection J.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 433 deleted “subsection E of” preceding “§ 54.1-2969” in subdivision D 1, and inserted “connection with the health care entity’s own health care operations or the health care operations of another health care entity, as specified in 45 C.F.R. § 164.501, or in” near the beginning of subdivision D 8.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 497 inserted “pursuant to a search warrant or a grand jury subpoena” in subdivision D 2; added subdivisions D 28 through 30 and redesignated remaining subdivisions accordingly; and substituted “32” for “29” near the beginning of the last paragraph in subdivision D 32.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 315 added the second sentence in subdivision D 2.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 782, 850 and 870 are identical, and in subdivision D 12, inserted “guardian ad litem and any” near the beginning, deleted “civil” preceding “commitment proceeding,” inserted “§

19.2-169.6

,

19.2-176

,

19.2-177.1

” preceding “Article 5” and substituted “Title 37.2, Article 16 (§ 16.1-353 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 16.1, or” for “Title 37.2 or” near the end; redesignated former subdivisions D 13 through D 32 as present subdivisions D 14 through D 33, respectively; inserted subdivision D 13; and substituted “through 33” for “through 32” in the second paragraph of subdivision D 33.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 606 and 651 are nearly identical, and in subsection D, added subdivision D 34 and substituted “subdivisions 1 through 34” for “subdivisions 1 through 33” in the last paragraph.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in subdivision D 26.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 185 inserted “54.1-3408.2” in subdivision D 6.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 340 and 406 are identical, and deleted “19.2-176, or

19.2-177.1

,” following “§

19.2-169.6

” in subdivisions D 12 and 13.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 456 and 524 are identical, and inserted D 35 and made related changes; and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and in subdivision D 13, substituted “Article 16 (§ 16.1-335 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 16.1” for “§ 16.1-338, 16.1-339, 16.1-342”; and in subdivision D 34, inserted “Article 16 (§ 16.1-335 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 16.1 or.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 499, in subsection E, added the first two sentences, in the third and fourth sentences, inserted “or electronic access to” and made minor stylistic changes, in the third sentence, inserted “or access such records,” in the fourth sentence, inserted “of or allow electronic access to the requested health records”; and in subsection F, twice inserted “or electronic access to.” Subsection E is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2011 amendment by c. 668, in subdivision A 1, deleted “of this section” following “subsections E and F”; added subdivision A 4; and in subsection E, added the first two sentences, in the third sentence, added clause (iv) and made a related change, and in the fifth sentence, inserted “in electronic format if so requested” and made minor stylistic changes. Subsection E is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 798 and 871 are identical, effective July 1, 2012, rewrote subdivision D 26, which read: “To the Office of the Inspector General for Behavioral Health and Developmental Services pursuant to Article 3 (§

37.2-423

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 37.2.”

The 2011 amendments by cc. 812 and 844 are identical, and added subsection K.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 386, in subdivision D 35, inserted “or by a private nonprofit institution of higher education” and deleted “public” following “student at the.”

The 2012 amendment by c. 402 added subdivision D 36 and made related changes.

The 2012 amendment by c. 479 inserted “32.1-320” following “32.1-283.1” in subdivision D 6.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by c. 554, in subdivision D 35, inserted “local school board pursuant to § 22.1-79.4 by a”; and deleted “when such records concerning a student at the institution of higher education, including a student who is a minor” preceding “and.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 457, in subdivision A 4, substituted “requester’s” for “requestor’s”; in subsection B, substituted “includes” for “shall include” in the definition of “Health plan” and “does not” for “shall not” in the definition of “Psychotherapy notes”;
in subsection E, substituted “requester” for “requestor” in the fourth sentence and substituted “30 days” for “15 days” in the fifth sentence; and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 712 and 720 are identical, and in subdivision D 6, inserted “54.1-2400.9” and deleted “54.1-2966.1.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 165 added subdivision C 4, and inserted “16.1-248.3” and “53.1-133.03” in subdivision D 6.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 945, in subsection F, deleted “or the individual’s treating” preceding “clinical psychologist” in the first sentence and inserted “or clinical social worker” following “clinical psychologist” wherever it appears and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 509, substituted “clinical psychologist, clinical social worker, or licensed professional counselor” for “clinical psychologist, or clinical social worker” throughout subsection F.

The 2022 amendment by c. 534, inserted “including an audit trail of any additions, deletions, or revisions to the health record, if specifically requested” in subdivision A 1.

The 2022 amendment by c. 784, added subdivision L.

Law Review.

For annual survey article discussing the state of health care law in Virginia, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 137 (2003).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For 2006 survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2006).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal law and procedure for the year 2007-2008, see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 149 (2008).

For article, “Paging Dr. Google: Personal Health Records and Patient Privacy,” see 51 Wm. and Mary L. Rev. 2243 (2010).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 9 Discovery. § 9.04 Privileges Against Discovery. Bryson.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 2-1403. Checklist for Attorney-Issued Subpoena. No. 7-111 Checklist for Attorney-Issued Subpoena, et seq. No. 8B-116 Subpoena Duces Tecum — Medical Records — Notice. No. 9-1411 Motion for Subpoena Duces Tecum — Medical Records, et seq. No. 13-405 Information and Release Form, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Physicians and Surgeons, § 3.